Maryland, session 2025, HB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–802.
There is an Office of Child Care Advisory Council.
9.5–803.
(a) (1) The Council consists of at least 25 members, but no more than [30] 31
members.
(2) In appointing members to the Council, the State Superintendent shall,
to the extent possible, appoint members representing geographically diverse jurisdictions
across the State.
(b) The members shall include:
(1) 1 member of the Senate of Maryland appointed by the President of the
Senate;
– 1 –

Ch. 376 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) 1 member of the Maryland House of Delegates appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(3) At least 1 representative, appointed by the Secretary, from:
(i) The Maryland Department of Health;
(ii) The Head Start Program;
(iii) The Department;
(iv) The Office of the State Fire Marshal;
(v) A local government;
(vi) A child care advocacy organization;
(vii) An independent school, which may include a religious,
nonsectarian, or nursery school;
(viii) A child care resource and referral agency;
(ix) The Department of the Environment;
(x) A community college with an early childhood education program;
(xi) The Maryland Association of Social Services Directors; [and]
(xii) A professional organization concerned with the quality of early
childhood programs; AND
(XIII) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF PUBLIC LIBRARY
ADMINISTRATORS;
(4) At least 1 representative, appointed by the State Superintendent, who
is:
(i) A local fire official who has responsibility for the enforcement or
administration of fire codes;
(ii) A user of child care services; and
(iii) A business person;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 376
(5) A pediatrician with an interest and expertise in child care issues,
appointed by the State Superintendent;
(6) At least two family child care providers, appointed by the State
Superintendent; and
(7) At least two child care providers from child care centers, appointed by
the State Superintendent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –